Utah statutes.
4-31-3.   Appraisal of fair market value before destruction.

(1)  Before any livestock or property is condemned and destroyed, an appraisal of the fair market value of the livestock or other property shall be forwarded to the commissioner by a panel of three qualified appraisers appointed as follows:

(a)  one by the commissioner;

(b)  one by the owner of the livestock or other property subject to condemnation; and

(c)  one by the appraisers specified in this Subsections (1)(a) and (b).

(2)  After review, the commissioner shall forward the appraisal to the board of examiners together with his recommendation concerning the amount, if any, that should be allowed.

(3)  Any costs incurred in the appraisal shall be paid by the state.

